Nebraska, session 109, LB411.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB411 LB411
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-8,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-8,114 (1) A teacher is eligible to receive a grant as prescribed
in this section may apply to the department for a grant. The department
shall not prioritize a grant based upon the school where the teacher
applicant teaches. The department shall distribute all grants
automatically to the school district employing the eligible teacher. The
school district shall distribute such grant funds to the teacher in
accordance with this section.
(2) This subsection applies until July 1, 2025. A teacher is
eligible to receive apply for:
(a) A retention one grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's second
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24 , or 2024-25 , 2025-26, or 2026-27;
(b) A retention two grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's fourth
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24 , or 2024-25 , 2025-26, or 2026-27;
(c) A retention three grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's sixth
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24 , or 2024-25 , 2025-26, or 2026-27; and
(d)(i) A high-need retention grant of five thousand dollars if on or
after June 2, 2023, a teacher:
(A) Obtains an endorsement in special education, mathematics,
science, technology, or dual credit; and
(B)(I) Prior For an application submitted prior to April 17, 2024,
signs a contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a
teacher at a Nebraska school in school year 2024-25 , 2025-26, or
2026-27; or
-2-

LB411 LB411
2025 2025
(II) On For an application submitted on or after April 17, 2024,
signs a contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a
teacher to teach in such endorsement area at a Nebraska school in school
year 2024-25 , 2025-26, or 2026-27.
(ii) A teacher shall only be eligible to receive one high-need
retention grant.
(3)(a) This subsection applies beginning July 1, 2025.
(b) The department shall automatically provide a retention grant to
a teacher who is eligible pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section.
(c) A teacher is eligible to receive:
(i) For such teacher's first through sixth school year of full-time
employment teaching at a Nebraska school, a retention grant of two
thousand five hundred dollars per school year;
(ii) For such teacher's seventh through fifteenth school year of
full-time employment teaching at a Nebraska school, a retention grant of
three thousand dollars per school year;
(iii) Beginning with such teacher's sixteenth year of full-time
employment teaching at a Nebraska school and each year of full-time
employment teaching at a Nebraska school thereafter, a retention grant of
four thousand dollars per school year; and
(iv)(A) A high-need retention grant of five thousand dollars if on
or after July 1, 2025, a teacher:
(I) Obtains an endorsement in special education, mathematics,
science, technology, or dual-credit; and
(II) Signs a contract to complete a year of full-time employment as
a teacher to teach in such endorsement area at a Nebraska school.
(B) A teacher shall only be eligible to receive one high-need
retention grant. A teacher that received a high-need retention grant
prior to July 1, 2025, pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section
shall not be eligible for a high-need retention grant pursuant to
subdivision (3)(c)(iv) of this section.
-3-

LB411 LB411
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Original section 79-8,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-